District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Clarifying Licensing Enriching All Neighbors (CLEAN) Amendment
Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 47-2862(a) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the phrase “; or” and inserting a semicolon in its
place.

(b) Paragraph (9) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; or” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (10) is added to read as follows:
“(10) Owes the District $1,000 or more in past due fines, penalties, or interest assessed
pursuant to a notice of infraction issued by the Department of Buildings under the Department of
Consumer and Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985, effective October 5, 1985 (D.C.
Law 6-42; D.C. Official Code § 2-1801.01 et seq.).
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of Congressional review
as provided in sections 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).